North Dakota, session 69, HB1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Specialist 4 Richard W. Orsund Vietnam bridge - State highway 18 - Continuing
appropriation.
The department shall designate the bridge on state highway 18 between the junction of sixty-ninth
street northeast and the junction of seventieth street northeast as the Specialis t 4 Richard W. Orsund
Vietnam bridge and shall place signs along the highway designating that name. The department may
accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the department for the placement of signs. Any
donated funds are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing
signs designating the bridge on state highway 18 as the Specialis t 4 Richard W. Orsund Vietnam
bridge.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1090 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1090 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State